Utah statutes.
70A-9a-512.   Amendment of financing statement.

(1) Subject to Section 70A-9a-509, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to Subsection (5), otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that:

(a)  identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

(b)  if the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a), provides:

(i) (A)  the entry number of the initial financing statement; or

(B)  the book and page where the initial financing statement was filed or recorded; and

(ii)  the information specified in Subsection 70A-9a-502(2).

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-515, the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

(3) A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

(4)  A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

(5)  An amendment is ineffective to the extent it:

(a)  purports to delete all debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement; or

(b)  purports to delete all secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

